North Dakota, session 69, HB1113.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 54-52.2 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Administrative expenses - Continuing appropriation.
1. A participating member shall pay the administrative expenses of the plan in a manner
determined by the board. The board:
a. Or a vendor retained by the board, may charge reasonable administrative expenses and
deduct those expenses from a participating member's account in the deferred
compensation plan established under this chapter.
b. May pay the administrative expenses of the plan from fines and fees collected from a
vendor in a manner determined by the board.
c. Shall deposit vendor fines and fees and any money deducted from a participating
member's account in an administrative expenses account with the state treasurer.
d. May use funds from the payroll clearing account established under section 54 - 52.3 - 03
and the administrative expenses account to pay for consulting expenses.
2. All money in the payroll clearing account and the administrative expenses account are
appropriated to the board on a continuing basis for the purpose of retaining a consultant as
required for the administration of this chapter.

H. B. NO. 1113 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1113.
House Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 2 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 0 Absent 3
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State